Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1014.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9-21-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 9-21 entitled "Judgments,
Orders, and Decrees" is hereby amended to read as follows:
9-21-10. Interest in civil actions.
(a) In any civil action in which a verdict is rendered or a decision made for pecuniary
damages, there shall be added by the clerk of the court to the amount of damages interest at the rate
of twelve percent (12%) per annum thereon from the date the cause of action accrued of the filing
of the civil action calculated at a rate equal to the coupon issue yield equivalent, as determined by
the United States secretary of the treasury, of the average accepted auction price for the last auction
of fifty-two (52) week United States treasury bills settled immediately preceding the date of the
filing of the action, which shall be included in the judgment entered therein. Post-judgment interest
shall be calculated at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum and accrue on both the principal
amount of the judgment and the prejudgment interest entered therein a rate equal to the coupon
issue yield equivalent, as determined by the United States secretary of the treasury, of the average
accepted auction price for the last auction of fifty-two (52) week United States treasury bills settled
immediately preceding the date of the filing of the action. This section shall not apply until entry
of judgment or to any contractual obligation where interest is already provided.
(b) Subsection (a) shall not apply in any action filed on or after January 1, 1987, for
personal injury or wrongful death filed against a licensed physician, hospital, clinic, health

maintenance organization, professional service corporation providing health care services, dentist,
or dental hygienist based on professional negligence. In all such medical malpractice actions in
which a verdict is rendered or a decision made for pecuniary damages, there shall be added by the
clerk of the court to the amount of damages interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum
thereon from the date of written notice of the claim by the claimant or his or her representative to
the malpractice liability insurer, or to the medical or dental health care provider or the filing of the
civil action, whichever first occurs.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002679
========
LC002679 - Page 2 of 3